Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1053.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-9-122, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-9-122. A. The Department of Human Services shall


establish and administer an ongoing program of supported


guardianship to assist families wishing to make a long-term


commitment to a child by accepting guardianship of the child. The


supported guardianship program shall enable the family to assume the


parental role without ongoing Department oversight but allow the


family to return to the Department for services as needed.


B. When the Department initially contacts or is contacted by a


family member or other individual regarding taking a potential

Req. No. 788 Page 1


guardianship of a child who was the subject of a referral to the


Department regarding allegations of abuse or neglect, the Department


shall provide the family member or other individual with information


regarding foster care, safety plans, kinship foster placements,


foster placements, and guardianships. This information shall


include, but not be limited to:


1. Potential options for taking custody of a child such as


foster placement or kinship foster placement, including information


that relatives can be foster placements if able to meet requisite


qualifications under the law;


2. Potential resources and assistance, whether monetary or in


services, that would be available to the child and family member or


other individual as either a kinship foster placement, foster


placement, safety plan monitor, or guardian, including disclosures


that guardianship placements receive less financial assistance than


foster placements; and


3. The family member or other individual’s duties and


responsibilities to the parents of the child as either a guardian,


kinship foster placement, foster placement, or safety plan monitor.


C. The Department shall obtain a signed and dated information


sheet from the relative or individual stating that the information


required by subsection B of this section was provided in writing,


was explained verbally, and that he or she understood the


information. The information sheet shall also be signed and dated

Req. No. 788 Page 2


by personnel from the Department stating that the information sheet


was provided to the relative or other individual and that the


information was explained verbally. A copy of the information sheet


may be kept by the family member or other individual. In the event


that the individual declines to be provided the information sheet,


Department personnel shall have the individual sign and date the


information sheet and indicate that he or she does not wish to be


provided the information sheet. The Department shall make the


information sheet available online and the information sheet may be


signed electronically. The signed information sheet shall be filed


along with any guardianship petition that is subsequently filed


regarding the child or children.


D. The information sheet shall be for informational purposes


only. The signed information sheet shall not constitute a binding


agreement between the individual and the Department. The


information sheet does not confer any additional duties or


obligations to the Department other than those already prescribed by


law, nor does it guarantee placement. Further, the information


sheet does not constitute legal advice.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-788 DC 1/16/2025 2:52:00 PM





Req. No. 788 Page 3